Utah statutes.
11-14-310.   General obligation bonds -- Levy and collection of taxes.

(1)  Any bonds issued under this chapter in such manner that they are not payable solely from revenues other than those derived from ad valorem taxes are full general obligations of the local political subdivision, for the prompt and punctual payment of principal of and interest on which the full faith and credit of the local political subdivision are pledged, and the local political subdivision is hereby expressly required, regardless of any limitations which may otherwise exist on the amount of taxes which the local political subdivision may levy, to provide for the levy and collection annually of ad valorem taxes without limitation as to rate or amount on all taxable property in the local political subdivision fully sufficient for such purpose.  If by law ad valorem taxes for the local political subdivision are levied by a board other than its governing body, the taxes for which provision is herein made shall be levied by such other board and the local political subdivision shall be under the duty in due season in each year to provide such other board with all information necessary to the levy of taxes in the required amount.  Such taxes shall be levied and collected by the same officers, at the same time and in the same manner as are other taxes levied for the local political subdivision.

(2)  If any local political subdivision shall neglect or fail for any reason to levy or collect or cause to be levied or collected sufficient taxes for the prompt and punctual payment of such principal and interest, any person in interest may enforce levy and collection thereof in any court having jurisdiction of the subject matter, and any suit, action or proceeding brought by such person in interest shall be a preferred cause and shall be heard and disposed of without delay.  All provisions of the constitution and laws relating to the collection of county and municipal taxes and tax sales shall also apply to and regulate the collection of the taxes levied pursuant to this section, through the officer whose duty it is to collect the taxes and money due the local political subdivision.

